California statutes. Business and Professions Code
If at the end of any fiscal year, the moneys derived from the licensing of alarm company operators and alarm agents is in surplus in an amount which equals or is more than the moneys necessary for the regulation of alarm company operators and alarm agents for the next two fiscal years, license or other fees shall be reduced, during the following fiscal year in an amount which will reduce any surplus moneys derived from the licensing of alarm company operators and alarm agents to an amount less than the moneys expended for the regulation of alarm company operators and alarm agents for the next two fiscal years.

This section shall become operative on and after July 1, 1983.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.   Section operative July 1, 1983, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Review [7599.80. - 7599.80.]

7599.80.

Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the bureau, as set forth in this chapter, shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The review shall be performed as if this chapter were scheduled to be repealed as of January 1, 2029.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 48.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12.  Cemetery and Funeral Act [7600. - 7746.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [7600. - 7610.1.]

7600.

This chapter of the Business and Professions Code constitutes the chapter on cemetery and funeral law. It may be cited as the Cemetery and Funeral Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 4.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7601.

The following terms as used in this chapter shall have meanings expressed in this section:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(b) “Director” means the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(c) “Bureau” means the Cemetery and Funeral Bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7601.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Cemetery and Funeral Bureau in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7602.

(a) (1) There is in the department the Cemetery and Funeral Bureau, under the supervision and control of the director.

(2) The director may appoint a chief at a salary to be fixed and determined by the director, with the approval of the Director of Finance. The duty of enforcing and administering this chapter is vested in the chief, and the chief is responsible to the director. The chief shall serve at the pleasure of the director.

(3) Every power granted or duty imposed upon the director under this chapter may be exercised or performed in the name of the director by a deputy director or by the chief, subject to conditions and limitations the director may prescribe.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the bureau, as set forth in this chapter, shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The review shall be performed as if this chapter is scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 589, Sec. 1.   (AB 3254)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7606.

The bureau may establish necessary rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of this act and the laws subject to its jurisdiction and prescribe the form of statements and reports provided for in this act. The rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 7.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7607.

(a) The bureau may inspect the premises in which the business of a funeral establishment, cemetery, or crematory is conducted, where embalming is practiced, or where human remains are stored.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 1.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

7607.

(a) The bureau may inspect the premises in which the business of a funeral establishment, reduction facility, cemetery, or crematory is conducted, where embalming is practiced, or where human remains are stored.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 2.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7608.

(a) The Director of Consumer Affairs may employ and appoint all employees necessary to properly administer the work of the bureau, in accordance with civil service regulations.

With the approval of the Director of Finance, and, subject to the provisions of Section 159.5, the bureau shall employ investigators and attorneys to assist the bureau in prosecuting violations of this chapter, whose compensation and expenses shall be payable only out of the Cemetery and Funeral Fund.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 9) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 10.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7609.

This chapter does not apply to, or in any way interfere with, the duties of any officer of any public institution or of any duly accredited medical college, nor does it apply to any hospital licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or anyone engaged only in the furnishing of burial receptacles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 11.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7610.

All suits or actions commenced in the superior court against the bureau shall be filed and tried either in the County of Sacramento, or in the county of the residence of the plaintiff or petitioner, or in the county where the act occurred, which is the basis of the suit or action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 102.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7610.1.

In the enforcement of this act and the laws subject to its jurisdiction, the bureau has all the powers and is subject to all the responsibilities vested in and imposed upon the head of a department under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11150) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 12.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Definitions and Regulation of Cemeteries [7611. - 7614.9.]

7611.

The definitions in this article govern the meaning of terms used in the act except as otherwise provided expressly or by necessary implication.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.1.

“Act” means the Cemetery and Funeral Bureau Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.2.

A “cemetery broker” is a person who, other than in reference to an occasional sale, sells or offers for sale, buys, or offers to buy, lists, leases or offers to lease, or solicits, or negotiates the purchase or sale, lease, or exchange of cemetery property or interment services, or interest therein, for his or her own account or for another.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.3.

A “cemetery salesperson” is a natural person who, other than in reference to an occasional sale, is employed by a cemetery broker to sell, or offer for sale, list or offer to list, or to buy, or to offer to buy, or to lease, or offer to lease, or to solicit, or to negotiate the purchase or sale or lease or exchange of cemetery property or interment services, or any interest therein, for his or her own account or for another.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.4.

(a) A “cemetery manager” is a person engaged in or conducting, or holding himself or herself out as engaged in those activities involved in, or incidental to, the maintaining, operating, or improving a cemetery licensed under this chapter, the interring of human remains, and the care, preservation, and embellishment of cemetery property.

(b) For persons licensed pursuant to Section 7637.1, a “cemetery manager” is a person engaged in or conducting, or holding himself or herself out as engaged in those activities involved in, or incidental to, the following:

(1) The maintaining, operating, or improving of a cemetery
 licensed under this chapter.

(2) The interment of human remains.

(3) The care, preservation, and embellishment of cemetery property.

(4) Activities described in Section 7637.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.5.

A “crematory manager” is a person engaged in or conducting, or holding himself or herself out as engaged in those activities involved in, or incidental to, the maintaining or operating of a crematory licensed under this chapter, and the cremation of human remains.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.6.

The definitions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 7000) of Part 1 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code are applicable to this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.7.

“Cemetery licensee” means any cemetery broker, cemetery salesperson, or cemetery manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.8.

“Crematory licensee” shall mean a corporation, partnership, or natural person licensed pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 7712) and shall mean a cemetery licensee for purposes of disciplinary action under Article 6 (commencing with Section 7686).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.9.

(a) A “cremated remains disposer” is a person who, for their own account or for another, disposes of, or offers to dispose of, cremated human remains or hydrolyzed human remains by scattering over or on land or sea.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 3.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.9.

(a) A “cremated remains disposer” is a person who, for the person’s own account or for another, disposes of, or offers to dispose of, cremated human remains or hydrolyzed human remains by scattering over or on land or sea. A “cremated remains disposer” also includes a person who, for the person’s own account or for another, integrates into the soil, or offers to integrate into the soil, reduced human remains.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 4.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.10.

“Endowment care” or “endowed care” shall include both general and special care funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.12.

(a) “Licensed hydrolysis facility” means a corporation, partnership, or natural person licensed pursuant to Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 7639). A licensed hydrolysis facility shall be considered a cemetery licensee for purposes of disciplinary action pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 7686).

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 846, Sec. 3.   (AB 967)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.

An “occasional sale” is a sale of cemetery property not acquired or held for purposes of resale or speculation, provided such sale is not one of a series of sales sufficient in number, scope, and character to constitute engaging in the business of selling or reselling or holding for speculation cemetery property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.1.

“Public cemetery” means a cemetery owned and operated by a city, county, city and county, or public cemetery district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.2.

This article does not apply to any of the following:

(a) A religious corporation, church, religious society or denomination, a corporation sole administering temporalities of any church or religious society or denomination, or any cemetery organized, controlled, and operated by any of them.

(b) A public cemetery.

(c) Any private or fraternal burial park not exceeding 10 acres in area, established prior to September 19, 1939; however, (1)   those cemeteries shall be subject to the cemetery brokerage provisions of this act, and (2)   any cemetery shall be subject to all of the provisions of this act if it collects a care, maintenance, or embellishment deposit
 or sets up a trust for burial purposes pursuant to Section 8775 of the Health and Safety Code, including funeral services such as mortuary, cremation, or other commodities or services furnished at the time of and in connection with that funeral or cremation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 589, Sec. 2.   (AB 3254)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.3.

The bureau shall disclose on its Internet Web site, information about each cemetery subject to the jurisdiction of the bureau. In addition to the information required by Section 27, the bureau shall disclose the name of the owner of each cemetery, the name of the cemetery, the business address of the cemetery owner, and the physical address of the cemetery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.4.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 8115 of the Health and Safety Code, in order to protect consumers, the bureau shall adopt regulations that establish minimum standards of maintenance for endowment care cemeteries under the jurisdiction of the bureau. The regulations shall consider differences in cemetery size, location, topography, and type of interments. The regulations shall also consider the extent to which funds are available from the cemetery’s endowment care funds to perform maintenance.

(b) The standards established pursuant to this section shall not supersede any standards of a higher level of care established pursuant
 to Section 8115 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.5.

(a) (1) Any person who holds or has held, or was named on, any license or registration under the jurisdiction of the bureau that has been, within the immediately preceding 10 years, revoked, suspended, placed on probation, or surrendered under a stipulated decision, and who is employed by, or who seeks employment with, a licensed cemetery, a licensed crematory, or a licensed cemetery broker in any capacity, shall inform the licensed cemetery manager, the licensed crematory manager, or the licensed cemetery broker of that revocation, suspension, probation, or surrender.

(2) A
 person subject to this subdivision shall inform the licensed cemetery manager, the licensed crematory manager, or the licensed cemetery broker upon application for employment by completing a form that shall be made available by the bureau.

(b) The cemetery manager, crematory manager, or cemetery broker who is informed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall notify the bureau by submitting the form within 30 days of being so informed. Failure of the cemetery manager, crematory manager, or cemetery broker to notify the bureau shall be a cause for a warning. A cemetery manager, crematory manager, or cemetery broker shall not be subject to a warning if his or her failure to notify the bureau is due to a false statement made by an employee.

(c) Any person required to notify the cemetery manager, crematory manager, or cemetery broker under subdivision (a) who fails to do so or who makes a false statement on the required form shall be subject to disciplinary action if that person is a licensee of the bureau, or that failure or false statement shall be cause for denial of a license under Section 480.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (a), the term “named on” applies to a person who was an owner, partner, or corporate officer of an entity that was licensed or registered under the act at the time that entity’s license or registration under the act was revoked, suspended, placed on probation, or surrendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.6.

(a) Each cemetery authority shall file with the bureau annually, on or before June 1, or within five months after close of their fiscal year provided approval has been granted by the bureau as provided for in Section 7612.7, a written report in a form prescribed by the bureau setting forth the following:

(1) The number of square feet of grave space and the number of crypts and niches sold or disposed of under endowment care by specific periods as set forth in the form prescribed.

(2) The amount collected and deposited in both the general and special endowment care funds segregated as to the amounts for crypts, niches, and grave
 space by specific periods as set forth either on the accrual or cash basis at the option of the cemetery authority.

(3) A statement showing separately the total amount of the general and special endowment care funds invested in each of the investments authorized by law and the amount of cash on hand not invested, which statement shall actually show the financial condition of the funds.

(4) A statement showing separately the location, description, and character of the investments in which the special endowment care funds are invested. The statement shall show the valuations of any securities held in the endowment care fund as valued pursuant to Section 7614.7.

(5) A statement showing the transactions entered into
 between the corporation or any officer, employee, or stockholder thereof and the trustees of the endowment care funds with respect to those endowment care funds. The statement shall show the dates, amounts of the transactions, and shall contain a statement of the reasons for those transactions.

(b) The report shall be verified by the president or vice president and one other officer of the cemetery corporation. The information submitted pursuant to paragraphs (2), (3), (4), and (5) of subdivision (a) shall be accompanied by an annual audit report, prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, of the endowment care fund and special care fund signed by a certified public accountant or public accountant. The scope of the audit shall include the inspection, review, and audit of the general purpose financial statements
 of the endowment care fund and special care fund, which shall include the balance sheet, the statement of revenues, expenditures, and changes in fund balance.

(c) If a cemetery authority files a written request prior to the date the report is due, the bureau may, in its discretion, grant an extension for no more than an additional nine months within which to file the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 750, Sec. 1.   (AB 926)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.7.

Each cemetery authority requesting a change of filing date of the endowment care fund report from a calendar year to a fiscal year or a change in fiscal year shall file a petition with the bureau prior to the close of the year of request. The bureau may approve such petition provided that no report shall be for a period of more than 12 months.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.8.

The report shall state the name of the trustee or trustees of the endowment care fund. Any change of trustee shall be reported to the bureau within a period of 30 days after the change is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.9.

A copy of each annual audit report shall be transmitted to the bureau and shall be a public record. It shall also be open for public inspection at the offices of the cemetery authority during normal business hours. If the cemetery authority does not maintain offices in the county in which its cemetery is located, it shall file a copy of the annual audit report with the county clerk of the county, which shall be subject to public inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.10.

(a) Any cemetery authority that does not file its report within the time prescribed by Section 7612.6 may be assessed a fine by the bureau in an amount not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400) per month for a maximum of five months. The amount of the fine shall be established by regulation in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Failure to pay the fine within 15 days after receipt of written notification of the assessment or, where a timely request for waiver or reduction of the fine has been filed, within 15 days after receipt of written notification of the bureau’s decision in the matter, shall be cause for
 disciplinary action.

(b) A cemetery authority may request waiver or reduction of a fine by making a written request therefor. The request shall be postmarked within the time specified above for payment of the fine and shall be accompanied by a statement showing good cause for the request.

(c) The bureau may waive or reduce the fine where a timely request is made and where it determines, in its discretion, that the cemetery authority has made a sufficient showing of good cause for the waiver or reduction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.11.

(a) The bureau shall conduct a study to obtain information to determine if the endowment care fund levels of each licensee’s cemetery are sufficient to cover the cost of future maintenance. The bureau shall also review the levels of endowment care funds that have previously been reported pursuant to this chapter by licensed cemeteries.

(b) For purposes of the report required in subdivision (a), each licensed cemetery authority shall provide the following information to the bureau on or before January 1, 2028:

(1) The year the cemetery was established.

(2) The total size of the developed and undeveloped acres of the cemetery.

(3) The total acreage of the developed cemetery property that has been sold for interment, including preneed sales.

(4) The total acreage of land sold for interment that contains spaces for which endowment care fees have been collected.

(5) The total acreage of developed cemetery property remaining to be sold.

(6) The total acreage of undeveloped cemetery property remaining to be sold.

(7) The year the cemetery started collecting endowment care fees.

(8) The total number of spaces the cemetery has sold for interment, including preneed sales.

(9) Of the total spaces
 the cemetery has sold for interment, the total number of spaces that have contributed to the endowment care funds of the cemetery.

(10) The number of interment spaces remaining to be sold in all developed acreage.

(11) The number of interment spaces remaining to be sold in undeveloped acreage, to the extent known.

(c) The bureau shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature by January 1, 2029.

(d) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is
 repealed on January 1, 2033.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 589, Sec. 3.   (AB 3254)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.12.

(a) On or before March 1, 2026, the bureau shall convene a workgroup composed of interested stakeholders including, but not limited to, representatives from the cemetery industry, the California Association of Local Agency Formation Commissions, the League of
 California Cities, the California State Association of Counties, the Urban Counties of California, the Rural County Representatives of California, public cemeteries, and legislative staff for the appropriate committees of the Legislature, to discuss options for ensuring continued care, maintenance, and embellishment of abandoned cemeteries, including the possibility of requiring counties to assume responsibility for maintenance, irrigation, public works, and burial services for cemeteries located within their boundaries that become abandoned.

(b) In accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, the bureau shall submit a report to the Legislature summarizing the discussions of the
 workgroup and its recommendations no later than
 June 1, 2026.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 658, Sec. 1.   (SB 777)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.

The bureau shall examine the reports filed with it as to their compliance with the requirements of the Health and Safety Code as to the amount of endowment care funds collected and as to the manner of investment of those funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.1.

The bureau shall examine the endowment care funds of a cemetery authority:

(a) Whenever it deems necessary and at least once every five years.

(b) Whenever the cemetery authority in charge of endowment care funds fails to file the report required by this article.

(c) Whenever the accountant or auditor qualifies their certification of the report that is prepared and signed by a certified public accountant licensed in the state and prepared in accordance with Section 7612.6.

(d) Whenever the bureau receives a valid complaint alleging the authority has engaged in financial misconduct or neglect of
 duties.

(e) The reasonable and necessary cost of the examination performed under subdivision (b) or (c) shall be paid by the cemetery authority.

(f) A certified copy of the actual costs, or a good faith estimate of the costs where actual costs are not available, signed by the director or the director’s designee, shall be prima facie evidence of the reasonable and necessary costs of the examination.

(g) The actual and necessary expense of the examination under subdivision (a) shall, in the discretion of the bureau, be paid by the cemetery authority whenever the examination requires more than one day and the need for continuing the examination is directly related to identified omissions and errors in the management of endowment care funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 442, Sec. 2.   (AB 651)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.2.

(a) If any cemetery authority refuses to pay such expenses, the bureau shall refuse it a certificate of authority and shall revoke any existing certificate of authority. All examination expense moneys collected by the bureau shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Cemetery and Funeral Fund.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13 (2nd text).   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.3.

(a) In making the examination, the bureau:

(1) Shall have free access to the books and records relating to the trust funds, their collection and investment, and the number of graves, crypts, and niches under endowment care.

(2) Shall inspect and examine the trust funds to determine their condition and the existence of the investments.

(3) Shall ascertain if the cemetery corporation
 has complied with all the laws applicable to trust funds.

(b) Upon request by the bureau, a cemetery authority shall provide records to substantiate the expenditures of the income of the trust funds. If a cemetery authority fails to reasonably comply with this request, the bureau may have access to books, records, and accounts of a cemetery authority for purposes of ascertaining compliance with applicable laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.4.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a limited liability company certificated as a cemetery authority pursuant to Section 7018 of the Health and Safety Code may provide services of licensed cemetery brokers, cemetery salespersons, cemetery managers, funeral directors, embalmers, crematorium licensees, and any other person licensed under this code to provide services relating to cemeteries and funerals by employing one or more of these licensed persons.

(b) At the time of certification, and at all times during which a limited liability company transacts intrastate business as a cemetery authority, the company
 shall be required to provide security for claims against it based upon acts, errors, or omissions of its licensed employees as described in subdivision (a) by complying with one, or a combination, of the following:

(1) (A) Maintaining a policy or policies of insurance against liability imposed on or against it by law for damages arising out of claims. However, the total aggregate limit of liability under the policy or policies of insurance for a limited liability company that employs five or fewer licensed persons shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), and for a limited liability company that employs more than five licensees, an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of insurance shall be obtained for each additional licensee except that
 the maximum amount of insurance is not required to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) in any one designated period, less amounts paid in defending, settling, or discharging claims as set forth in this paragraph. The policy or policies may be issued on a claims-made or occurrence basis, and shall cover:

(i) In the case of a claims-made policy, claims initially asserted in the designated period.

(ii) In the case of an occurrence policy, occurrences during the designated period.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “designated period” means a
 policy year or any other designated period in the policy that is not greater than 12 months.

(C) The impairment or exhaustion of the aggregate limit of liability by amounts paid under the policy in connection with the settlement, discharge, or defense of claims applicable to a designated period shall not require the limited liability company to acquire additional insurance coverage for that designated period. The policy or policies of insurance may be in a form reasonably available in the commercial insurance market and may be subject to those terms, conditions, exclusions, and endorsements that are typically contained in those policies. A policy or policies of insurance maintained pursuant to this paragraph may be subject to a deductible or self-insured retention.

(D) Upon the dissolution and winding up of the limited liability company, the company shall, with respect to any insurance policy or policies then maintained pursuant to this paragraph, maintain or obtain an extended reporting period endorsement or equivalent provision in the maximum aggregate limit of liability required to comply with this paragraph for a minimum of three years if reasonably available from the insurer.

(2) Maintaining in trust or bank escrow, cash, bank certificates of deposit, United States Treasury obligations, bank letters of credit, or bonds of insurance or surety companies as security for payment of liabilities imposed by law for damages arising out of all claims. However, the maximum amount of security
 for a limited liability company that employs five or fewer licensed persons shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), and for a limited liability company that employs more than five licensees rendering professional services on behalf of the company, an additional one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of security shall be obtained for each additional licensee except that the maximum amount of security is not required to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000). The limited liability company remains in compliance with this section during a calendar year notwithstanding amounts paid during that calendar year from the accounts, funds, Treasury obligations, letters of credit, or bonds in defending, settling, or discharging claims of the type described in this paragraph, provided that the amount of those accounts, funds, Treasury obligations, letters of credit, or bonds was at least
 the amount specified in the preceding sentence as of the first business day of that calendar year. Notwithstanding the pendency of other claims against the limited liability company, it shall be deemed to be in compliance with this paragraph as to a claim if within 30 days after the time that a claim is initially asserted through service of a summons, complaint, or comparable pleading in a judicial or administrative proceeding, the limited liability company has provided the required amount of security by designating and segregating funds in compliance with the requirements of this paragraph.

(3) Unless the limited liability company has satisfied paragraph (4), each member of a limited liability company certificated as a cemetery authority that provides professional services rendered by
 employees who are licensed professionals described in subdivision (a), by virtue of that person’s status as a member, thereby automatically guarantees payment of the difference between the maximum amount of security required for the limited liability company by this subdivision and the security otherwise provided in accordance with paragraphs (1) and (2), provided that the aggregate amount paid by all members under these guarantees shall not exceed the difference. Neither withdrawal by a member nor the dissolution and winding up of the limited liability company shall affect the rights or obligations of a member arising prior to withdrawal or dissolution and winding up, and the guarantee provided for in this paragraph shall apply only to conduct that occurred prior to the withdrawal or dissolution and winding up. Nothing contained in this subdivision shall affect or impair the rights or obligations
 of the members among themselves, or the limited liability company, including, but not limited to, rights of contribution, subrogation, or indemnification.

(4) Confirming, pursuant to the procedure in subdivision (c) of Section 16956 of the Corporations Code, that, as of the most recently completed fiscal year of the limited liability company, it had a net worth equal to or exceeding ten million dollars ($10,000,000). The limited liability company shall transmit evidence of this paragraph to the bureau in a form similar to the form submitted by a limited liability partnership providing
 alternative security provisions pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16956 of the Corporations Code.

(c) (1) A limited liability company may aggregate the security required pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b).

(2) For purposes of compliance with this section, the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 16956 of the Corporations Code shall apply to a limited liability company certificated as a cemetery authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 13.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.5.

(a) A person licensed under this code as a cemetery broker, cemetery salesperson, cemetery manager, funeral director, embalmer, crematorium licensee, or other person licensed to provide services related to cemeteries and funerals shall not have any ownership interest as a member in a limited liability company certificated as a cemetery authority pursuant to Section 7018 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) If a limited liability company admits, as a member with ownership interest, a licensed person described in subdivision (a), the limited liability company, by operation of law, shall be deemed in violation
 of subdivision (e) of Section 17701.04 of the Corporations Code, and the members shall be treated as partners with joint and several liability for claims made upon acts, errors, or omissions arising out of services provided by any licensed person described in subdivision (a).

(c) If the bureau determines that a licensed cemetery broker, cemetery salesperson, cemetery manager, funeral director, embalmer, crematorium licensee, or other person licensed to provide services related to cemeteries and funerals has an ownership interest as a member in the limited liability company, the bureau shall suspend the limited liability company’s certificate of authority. The bureau shall reinstate the certificate of authority only upon finding that the licensed cemetery broker, cemetery salesperson,